District of Columbia statutes.
42-148

Short forms.

The following short form certificates of notarial acts shall be sufficient for the purposes indicated, if completed with the information required by § 42-147(a).

(1)

For an acknowledgment in an individual capacity:

District of Columbia

This instrument was acknowledged before me on (date) by (name(s) of person(s)).

____________________

(Signature of notarial officer)

(Seal, if any)

____________________

Title (and Rank)

(My commission expires: ________)

(2)

District of Columbia

This instrument was acknowledged before me on (date) by (name(s) of person(s)) as (type of authority, e.g., officer, trustee, etc.) of (name of party on behalf of whom instrument was executed).

____________________

(Signature of notarial officer)

(Seal, if any)

____________________

Title (and Rank)

(My commission expires: ________)

(3)

For an acknowledgment in a representative capacity:

For a verification upon oath or affirmation:

District of Columbia

Signed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me on (date) by (name(s) of person(s) making statement).

____________________

(Signature of notarial officer)

(Seal, if any)

____________________

Title (and Rank)

(My commission expires: ________)

(4)

For witnessing or attesting a signature:

District of Columbia

Signed or attested before me on (date) by (name(s) of person(s)).

____________________

(Signature of notarial officer)

(Seal, if any)

____________________

Title (and Rank)

(My commission expires: ________)

(5)

Repealed.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-205, § 9, 37 DCR 8444
Dec. 10, 1991, D.C. Law 9-52, § 2(b), 38 DCR 6585
This section is referenced in § 42-147.
1981 Ed., § 45-628.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Uniform Law on Notarial Acts Temporary Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-9, July 13, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 4812).

Application of Law 9-52: Section 3 of D.C. Law 9-52 provided that the act shall apply as of March 6, 1991.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Law on Notarial Acts.